Missouri, session 2026, SB1599.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 621.135, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 621.135,
to read as follows:
621.135. 1. The provisions of chapter 536, and any
amendments thereto, except those provisions or amendments
which are in conflict with sections 621.015 to 621.198, and
any civil rule hereafter adopted which supersedes an
applicable provision of chapter 536, shall apply to and
govern the proceedings of the administrative hearing
commission and the rights and duties of the parties involved.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, a change of commissioner shall be ordered in
any case upon the timely filing of a written application
therefor by a party. The application need not allege or
prove any cause for such change of commissioner and need not
be verified. The application must be filed within twenty
days from the issuance of the notice of a complaint or
thirty days from the designation of the commissioner,
whichever time is longer. In the case of an intervenor, the
application must be filed within ten days of intervention.
✓